Utah statutes.
26-10-5.5.   Child literacy -- Distribution of information kits.
(1)  The Legislature recognizes that effective child literacy programs can
have a dramatic long-term impact on each child's ability to:
(a)  succeed in school;
(b)  successfully compete in a global society; and
(c)  become a productive, responsible citizen.
(2) (a)  To help further this end, the department may make available to
parents of new-born infants, as a resource, an information kit regarding child
development, the development of emerging literacy skills, and activities which
promote and enhance emerging literacy skills, including reading aloud to the
child on a regular basis.
(b)  The department shall seek private funding to help support this program.
(3) (a)  The department may seek assistance from the State Office of Education
and local hospitals in making the information kit available to parents on a
voluntary basis.
(b)  The department may also seek assistance from private entities in making
the kits available to parents.
